New York, session 2025-2026, S10313.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The general municipal law is amended by adding a new 2 section 74-d to read as follows: 3 § 74-d. Digital parking payment applications; required parking 4 enforcement notices. 1. For purposes of this section: (a) "digital park- 5 ing payment application" shall mean any mobile application, website, or 6 digital platform authorized by a municipal corporation or parking 7 authority that allows a user to pay for on-street or municipally oper- 8 ated parking; and 9 (b) "parking authority" shall mean any public authority established 10 under article seven of the public authorities law. 11 2. Any municipal corporation or parking authority that authorizes or 12 implements the use of a digital parking payment application shall ensure 13 that such application: 14 (a) clearly and conspicuously displays, in a text color that is 15 different from other text in such digital parking payment application, 16 all applicable parking restrictions for the selected parking location 17 prior to or at the time of payment, including but not limited to: 18 (i) permitted parking duration limits; 19 (ii) metered parking hours of operation; 20 (iii) no parking, no standing, or no stopping periods; 21 (iv) street cleaning or alternate-side parking rules; 22 (v) permit-only or restricted-use designations; and 23 (vi) any other restriction that may result in the issuance of a park- 24 ing violation; EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15338-05-6 S. 10313--A 2 1 (b) provides location-specific information that is reasonably accurate 2 for the date and time selected by the user; 3 (c) is updated on a regular basis to reflect changes in applicable 4 parking rules and restrictions; 5 (d) includes a clear notice to users where any parking restriction 6 information may be incomplete or subject to change; and 7 (e) includes a clear notice to users that if a user, after being made 8 aware of applicable parking restrictions, proceeds to violate such park- 9 ing restrictions, such user may be subject to fines, penalties or both 10 as set forth in applicable state law, local law or local ordinance, 11 including but not limited to, the issuance of a ticket, towing or vehi- 12 cle immobilization. 13 3. Each municipal corporation or parking authority that authorizes or 14 implements a digital parking payment application shall make available to 15 such application, in a commercially reasonable and readable format, 16 current information regarding parking rules and restrictions necessary 17 to comply with this section. 18 4. Nothing in this section shall be construed to invalidate or other- 19 wise affect the enforceability of any parking violation issued pursuant 20 to applicable law. 21 5. Where a contractor is operating a digital parking payment applica- 22 tion on behalf of a municipal corporation or parking authority, such 23 contractor shall not be deemed in violation of this section where such 24 contractor demonstrates that they reasonably relied upon parking regu- 25 lation data provided by the municipal corporation or parking authority. 26 § 2. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day after 27 it shall have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amend- 28 ment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implemen- 29 tation of this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and 30 completed on or before such date.